Utah statutes.
78B-1-150.   Witnesses -- When criminal defense witness may be called at
expense of state.
A witness for a defendant in a criminal cause  may not be subpoenaed at the
expense of the state, county, or city, except upon order of the court.   The
order shall be made only upon affidavit of the defendant, showing:
(1)  the defendant is impecunious and unable to pay the per diems of the
witness;
(2)  the evidence of the witness is material for defendant's defense as
advised by counsel, if counsel is in place; and
(3)  the defendant cannot safely proceed to trial without the witness.
